Tennessee, session 114, SB0198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-1-202(a)(7), is amended by
adding the following language after "deem appropriate":
. The annual report may be sent in electronic format to the state board of
equalization.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0198
001696
- 1 -